Alaska statutes. Title 14. Education, Libraries, and Museums.
Article 8. Health, Safety, and Physical Education.

Collateral references. —

68 Am. Jur. 2d Schools, § 311 et seq.

78A C.J.S. Schools and School Districts, § 778 et seq.

Tort liability of public schools and institutions of higher learning for accidents occurring in physical education classes. 36 ALR3d 361.

Validity of sex education programs in public schools. 82 ALR3d 579.

Sec. 14.30.360.
Health education curriculum; physical activity guidelines.

Each district in the state public school system shall be encouraged to initiate and conduct a program in health education for kindergarten through grade 12. The program should include instruction in physical health and personal safety including alcohol and drug abuse education, cardiopulmonary resuscitation (CPR), early cancer prevention and detection, dental health, family health including infant care, environmental health, the identification and prevention of child abuse, child abduction, neglect, sexual abuse, and domestic violence, and appropriate use of health services.

The state board shall establish guidelines for a health and personal safety education program. Personal safety guidelines shall be developed in consultation with the Council on Domestic Violence and Sexual Assault. Upon request, the Department of Education and Early Development, the Department of Health and Social Services, and the Council on Domestic Violence and Sexual Assault shall provide technical assistance to school districts in the development of personal safety curricula. A school health education specialist position shall be established and funded in the department to coordinate the program statewide. Adequate funds to enable curriculum and resource development, adequate consultation to school districts, and a program of teacher training in health and personal safety education shall be provided.

In addition to the health education program encouraged under (a) of this section, a school district shall establish guidelines for schools in the district to provide opportunities during each full school day for students in grades kindergarten through eight for a minimum of 90 percent of the daily amount of physical activity recommended for children and adolescents in the physical activity guidelines by the Centers for Disease Control and Prevention, United States Department of Health and Human Services. The time provided for physical activity under this subsection may include physical education classes and opportunities for unstructured physical activity, such as recess. A school district shall adopt guidelines under this subsection that

allow a student to be excused from the physical activity opportunities if the student is unable to participate for a medical reason; and

provide an exemption from the physical activity opportunities under this subsection for health and safety reasons, such as inclement weather.

In this section, “district” has the meaning given in AS

14.17.990

.

History.

(§ 1 ch 188 SLA 1976; am § 1 ch 106 SLA 1978; am § 1 ch 87 SLA 1984; am § 1 ch 24 SLA 1986; am § 1 ch 4 SLA 1998; am § 1 ch 40 SLA 2016)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 1999, in (b) of this section, “Department of Education” was changed to “Department of Education and Early Development” in accordance with § 89, ch. 58, SLA 1999.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2016 amendment, effective October 16, 2016, added (c) and (d).

Sec. 14.30.361.
Sex education, human reproductive education, and human sexuality education.

A person may only teach a class or program in sex education, human reproduction education, or human sexuality education if the person

possesses a valid teacher certificate issued under AS 14.20 and is employed under a contract with the school; or

is supervised by a person who meets the requirements under (1) of this subsection.

Before curriculum, literature, or materials related to sex education, human reproduction education, or human sexuality education may be used in a class or program or distributed in a school, the curriculum, literature, or materials must be

approved by the school board; and

available for parents to review.

Before a person teaches a class or program under (a)(2) of this section,

the person must be approved by the school board; and

the person’s credentials must be available for parents to review.

The requirements under (a) of this section do not apply to

sexual abuse and sexual assault awareness and prevention training required under AS

14.30.355

; or

dating violence and abuse awareness and prevention training required under AS

14.30.356

.

History.

(§§ 18, 19 ch 54 SLA 2016)

Effect of amendments. —

The 2016 amendment, effective October 26, 2016, added (d).

Effective dates. —

Section 18, ch. 54, SLA 2016, which enacted this section, took effect on October 26, 2016.

Sec. 14.30.362.
Suicide awareness and prevention training.

A school district and the department shall provide youth suicide awareness and prevention training approved by the commissioner to each teacher, administrator, counselor, and specialist who is employed by the district or department to provide services to students in a public school in the state at no cost to the teacher, administrator, counselor, or specialist.

The commissioner shall approve youth suicide awareness and prevention training provided under this section if the training meets standards for professional continuing education credit in the state and is periodically reviewed by a qualified person or committee for consistency with generally accepted principles of youth suicide awareness and prevention. The training may be offered through videoconferencing or an individual program of study of designated materials.

A person may not bring a civil action for damages against the state or a school district, or an officer, agent, or employee of the state or a school district, for a death, personal injury, or property damage that results from an act or omission in performing or failing to perform activities or duties authorized under this section. This subsection does not apply to a civil action for damages as a result of intentional misconduct with complete disregard for the safety and property of others.

The training under this section shall be provided according to the schedule adopted by the governing body of a school district.

The training provided or the failure to provide training under this section may not be construed to impose a specific duty of care on any person.

History.

(§ 15 ch 2 SSSLA 2015; am § 20 ch 54 SLA 2016)

Effect of amendments. —

The 2016 amendment, effective October 26, 2016, in (a), deleted “in grades seven through 12” following “services to students”.

Effective dates. —

Section 30, ch. 2, SSSLA 2015 made this section effective July 1, 2016.

Sec. 14.30.365.
Interscholastic activities; eligibility.

A full-time student who is eligible under (b) of this section who is enrolled in grades nine through 12 in an alternative education program that is located in the state and that does not offer interscholastic activities is eligible to participate in any interscholastic activities program available in a public school

that, based on the residence of the parent or legal guardian, the student would be eligible to attend were the student not enrolled in an alternative education program; or

at which the student requests to participate, if

the student shows good cause; and

the governing body of the school approves.

A student is eligible to participate in interscholastic activities under this section if the student

is otherwise eligible to participate in interscholastic activities under requirements established by the school, the school district, and the statewide interscholastic activities governing body;

provides documentation, including academic transcripts, proof of full-time enrollment, and applicable disciplinary records, and, if required for participation in an activity by the school, requested medical records, to the school providing the interscholastic activities program; and

claims the same school for interscholastic activities eligibility purposes during a school year.

In this section,

“alternative education program” means a public secondary school that provides a nontraditional education program, including the Alaska Military Youth Academy; a public vocational, remedial, or theme-based program; a home school program that is accredited by a recognized accrediting body; a charter school authorized under AS

14.03.250

—

14.03.290

; and a statewide correspondence school that enrolls students who reside outside of the district in which the student resides and provides less than three hours a week of scheduled face-to-face student interactions in the same location with a teacher who is certified under AS

14.20.020

;

“district” has the meaning given in AS

14.17.990

;

“full-time student” means a student who

is enrolled in not less than five classes in grades nine through 11 and not less than four classes in grade 12; and

is on track to graduate from secondary school in not more than four years of attendance in secondary school;

“interscholastic activities” means preparation for and participation in events or competitions involving another school when the preparation or participation

is sanctioned or supported by the statewide interscholastic activities governing body;

is conducted outside of the regular school curriculum; and

does not involve participation in student government at a school;

“located in the state” means that the alternative education program is accessed by a student who is located in the state and provides for all instructional hours to take place at a site in the state.

History.

(§ 2 ch 49 SLA 2012; am §§ 1, 2 ch 62 SLA 2013)

Cross references. —

For provisions relating to participation in interscholastic activities available in a religious or other private school regulated under AS 14.45, see AS

14.45.150

.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2013 amendment, effective July 1, 2013, in (a), deleted “entirely” following “alternative education program that is located”; added (c)(5).

Effective dates. —

Section 4, ch. 49, SLA 2012 makes this section effective July 1, 2013.

Sec. 14.30.370.
Evaluation.

Health education programs conducted under AS

14.30.360

shall be evaluated by the department in the same manner as other curriculum programs are evaluated, except that the evaluation shall also include changes in the health status of the pupils as determined by physical and dental examinations conducted under AS

14.30.070

.

History.

(§ 1 ch 188 SLA 1976; am § 16 ch 2 SSSLA 2015)

Effect of amendments. —

The 2015 amendment, effective October 7, 2015, deleted “and 14.30.120” at the end.

Sec. 14.30.375.
School gardens, greenhouses, and farms. [Repealed, § 5 ch 11 SLA 2010.]